Utah statutes.
10-8-21.   Lighting facilities -- Sale of gas and electric power -- Erection
and removal of poles and wires.
They may provide for the lighting of streets and the erection of necessary
appliances and lamp posts; may regulate the sale and use of gas, natural gas
and electric or other lights and electric power within the city, and regulate
the inspection of meters therefor; may prohibit or regulate the erection of
telegraph, telephone or electric wire poles in the public grounds, streets or
alleys, and the placing of wires thereon; and may require the removal from the
public grounds, streets or alleys of any or all such poles, and the placing
underground of any or all telegraph, telephone or electric wires.
